da: Yderligere funktioner for grafiksoftware: Digital illustration; Layoutdesign; Logodesign; Raster-grafik; UI/UX-design; Vektorgrafik; Andet
hu: Grafikus szoftver további funkciói: Digitális ábrázolás; Arculattervezés; Logótervezés; Rasztergrafika; UI-/UX-tervezés; Vektorgrafika; Egyéb
it: Funzionalità aggiuntive del software grafico: Illustrazione digitale; Design del layout; Design del logo; Grafica raster; Design dell'interfaccia utente/esperienza utente; Grafica vettoriale; Altro
el: Πρόσθετες δυνατότητες λογισμικού γραφικών: Ψηφιακή εικονογράφηση; Σχεδιασμός διάταξης; Σχεδιασμός λογότυπου; Γραφικά raster; Σχεδιασμός UI/UX; Διανυσματικά γραφικά; Άλλο
es: Características adicionales del software de gráficos: Ilustración digital; Diseño de maquetación; Diseño de logotipos; Gráficos rasterizados; Diseño de interfaz/experiencia del usuario; Gráficos vectoriales; Otros
de: Zusätzliche Funktionen der Grafiksoftware: Digitale Illustration; Layout-Design; Logo-Design; Rastergrafiken; UI/UX-Design; Vektorgrafiken; Sonstiges
tr: Ek grafik yazılım özellikleri: Dijital illüstrasyon; Düzen tasarımı; Logo tasarımı; Raster Grafikler; Kullanıcı arayüzü/UX tasarımı; Vektör Grafikleri; Diğer
hr-HR: Dodatne značajke softvera za grafički dizajn: Digitalna ilustracija; Dizajn izgleda; Dizajn logotipa; Rasterska grafika; UI/UX dizajn; Vektorska grafika; Ostalo
ko: 추가 그래픽 소프트웨어 기능: 디지털 일러스트레이션; 레이아웃 디자인; 로고 디자인; 래스터 그래픽; UI/UX 디자인; 벡터 그래픽; 기타
nl: Extra functies voor grafische software: Digitale illustratie; Lay-out ontwerp; Logo-ontwerp; Rasterafbeeldingen; UI/UX-ontwerp; Vectorafbeeldingen; Andere
cs: Další vlastnosti grafického softwaru: Digitální ilustrace; Návrh rozložení; Grafické návrhy loga; Rastrová grafika; UI/UX design; Vektorová grafika; Jiné
ro-RO: Funcții suplimentare software de editare grafică: Ilustrație digitală; Layout design; Design logo; Grafică raster; Design UI/UX; Grafică vectorială; Altele
pt-PT: Características adicionais de software gráfico: Ilustração digital; Design de layouts; Design do logótipos; Gráficos rasterizados; Design UI/UX; Gráficos de vetor; Outro
pt-BR: Recursos adicionais de software gráfico: Ilustração digital; Design de layout; Design de logotipo; Gráficos rasterizados; Design de UI/UX; Gráficos vetoriais; Outro
en: Additional graphic software features: Digital illustration; Layout design; Logo design; Raster graphics; UI/UX design; Vector graphics; Other
ru: Дополнительные функции программного обеспечения для работы с графикой: Цифровая иллюстрация; Разработка макетов; Разработка логотипов; Растровая графика; Разработка пользовательских интерфейсов; Векторная графика; Другое
fr: Fonctionnalités supplémentaires du logiciel de graphisme: Illustration numérique; Conception de la mise en page; Conception de logo; Graphiques raster; Conception d’interface utilisateur/expérience utilisateur; Graphiques vectoriels; Autre
zh-TW: 附加平面設計軟體功能: 數位插圖; 版面設計; 標誌設計; 光柵圖形; 使用者介面/使用者體驗設計; 向量圖形; 其他
vi: Các tính năng phần mềm đồ họa bổ sung: Minh họa kỹ thuật số; Thiết kế bố cục; Thiết kế logo; Đồ họa raster; Thiết kế UI/UX; Đồ họa vector; Khác
fi: Graafisen ohjelmiston lisäominaisuudet: Digitaalinen kuvitus; Ulkoasun suunnittelu; Logosuunnittelu; Rasterigrafiikka; UI/UX-suunnittelu; Vektorigrafiikka; Muu
bg-BG: Допълнителни функции на графичния софтуер: Дигитална илюстрация; Дизайн на оформлението; Лого дизайн; Растерна графика; UI/UX дизайн; Векторна графика; Други
ja: その他のグラフィックソフトウェア機能: デジタルイラスト; レイアウトデザイン; ロゴデザイン; ラスターグラフィックス; UI/UXデザイン; ベクターグラフィックス; その他
lt-LT: Papildomos grafikos programinės įrangos funkcijos: Skaitmeninė iliustracija; Maketavimas; Logotipo dizainas; Rastrinė grafika; UI/UX dizainas; Vektorinė grafika; Kita
pl: Dodatkowe funkcje oprogramowania do przetwarzania grafiki: Ilustracja cyfrowa; Projekt układu; Projekt logo; Grafika rastrowa; Projekt UI/UX; Grafika wektorowa; Inne
zh-CN: 其他图形软件功能: 数字插图; 版面设计; logo 设计; 光栅图形; UI/UX 设计; 矢量图形; 其他
sk-SK: Ďalšie funkcie grafického softvéru: Digitálna ilustrácia; Návrh rozloženia; Dizajn loga; Rastrová grafika; Návrh UI/UX; Vektorová grafika; Iné
th: คุณลักษณะเพิ่มเติมของซอฟต์แวร์กราฟิก: ภาพประกอบแบบดิจิทัล; การออกแบบเค้าโครง; การออกแบบโลโก้; ภาพกราฟิกส์แบบแรสเตอร์; การออกแบบ UI/UX; ภาพกราฟิกส์แบบเวกเตอร์; อื่นๆ
sv: Ytterligare detaljer för grafisk programvara: Digital illustration; Layout-design; Logotypdesign; Rastergrafik; UI/UX-design; Vektorgrafik; Övrigt
nb: Tilleggsfunksjoner for grafikkprogramvare: Digital illustrasjon; Layoutdesign; Logodesign; Rastergrafikk; UI/UX-design; Vektorgrafikk; Annet
sl-SI: Dodatne funkcije grafične programske opreme: Digitalna ilustracija; Oblikovanje postavitve; Oblikovanje logotipa; Rastrska grafika; UI/UX oblikovanje; Vektorska grafika; Drugo